Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska60-658
School bus, defined.

School bus shall mean any motor vehicle which complies with the general
design, equipment, and color requirements adopted and promulgated pursuant
to subdivision (12) of section 79-318 and
which is used to transport students to or from school or in connection with
school activities but shall not include buses operated by common carriers
in urban transportation of school students.

Laws 1993, LB 370, § 154;

Laws 1993, LB 575, § 5;

Laws 2009, LB549, § 3;

Laws 2013, LB222, § 20.